Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.785, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Publication. The commissioner shall gather and compile annually statistical data on the extent and nature of trafficking in Minnesota. The commissioner shall publish the data every deleted text begin two yearsdeleted text end new text begin yearnew text end . This publication shall be available to the public and include, to the extent possible, the information to be collected in subdivision 1 and any other information the commissioner finds relevant to the issue of trafficking in Minnesota.